Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.020

Injunction authorized.

The prosecuting attorney of every county of the state, in which a person, firm, or corporation sells or distributes or offers to sell or distribute or has in his or her possession with intent to sell or distribute any book, magazine, pamphlet, comic book, story paper, writing, paper, newspaper, phonograph record, magnetic tape, electric or mechanical transcription, picture, drawing, photograph, figure, image, or any written or printed matter of an indecent character, which is obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy, or indecent, or which contains an article or instrument of indecent use or purports to be for indecent use or purpose, may maintain an action in the name of the state for an injunction against such person, firm, or corporation in the superior court to prevent the sale or further sale or the distribution or further distribution or the acquisition or possession of any book, magazine, pamphlet, comic book, story paper, writing, paper, newspaper, phonograph record, magnetic tape, electric or mechanical transcription, picture, drawing, photograph, figure, or image or any written or printed matter of indecent character, herein described.

[ 2011 c 336 s 203; 1959 c 105 s 2.]